Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20151-105
Act, how cited.

Sections 1-105 to 1-171 shall be known and may be cited as the Public Accountancy Act.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 64, p. 78;

Laws 1991, LB 75, § 14;

Laws 1994, LB 957, § 7;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 1-169;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB31, § 1;

Laws 2015, LB159, § 1.
August 30, 2015